Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.200

Moratoria, interim zoning controls—Public hearing—Limitation on length.

A council or board that adopts a moratorium or interim zoning control, without holding a public hearing on the proposed moratorium or interim zoning control, shall hold a public hearing on the adopted moratorium or interim zoning control within at least sixty days of its adoption, whether or not the council or board received a recommendation on the matter from the commission. If the council or board does not adopt findings of fact justifying its action before this hearing, then the council or board shall do so immediately after this public hearing. A moratorium or interim zoning control adopted under this section may be effective for not longer than six months, but may be effective for up to one year if a work plan is developed for related studies providing for such a longer period. A moratorium or interim zoning control may be renewed for one or more six-month periods if a subsequent public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior to each renewal.

[ 1992 c 207 s 1.]